Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Part 2 Tennessee Retail Food Safety Act
53-8-220. Injunctive relief.

When the commissioner has reason to believe that a person is causing, is about to cause, or has caused a violation of this part or of the rules and regulations promulgated under this part, the commissioner may initiate proceedings in either the chancery court of Davidson County or the chancery court of the county where the violation is occurring, for injunctive relief to prevent the continuance of the violation or to correct the conditions resulting in, or about to result in, the violation.

Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 20.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 8, part 2, §§ 53-8-201 — 53-8-222 (Acts 1986, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3-23; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 148, § 1; 1995, ch. 383, § 1; 2001, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 29, § 2), concerning the Retail Food Store Inspection Act of 1986, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 182, §§ 1-21, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 50. July 1, 2015; provided, that, for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 23, 2013.

53-8-221. Sale of food by children at public events.

Notwithstanding this part to the contrary, children eighteen (18) years of age or younger do not need a license or permit to sell bakery goods, homemade or otherwise, soft drinks, or other similar food commodities at public events.

Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 21.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 8, part 2, §§ 53-8-201 — 53-8-222 (Acts 1986, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3-23; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 148, § 1; 1995, ch. 383, § 1; 2001, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 29, § 2), concerning the Retail Food Store Inspection Act of 1986, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 182, §§ 1-21, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 50. July 1, 2015; provided, that, for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 23, 2013.

53-8-222. Injunctions.

When the commissioner has reason to believe that a person has caused, is causing, or is about to cause a violation of this part or the rules and regulations promulgated under this part, the commissioner may initiate proceedings in either the chancery court of Davidson County or the chancery court of the county where the violation is occurring for injunctive relief to prevent the continuance of the violation or to correct the conditions resulting in, or about to result in, the violation.

Acts 1986, ch. 633, § 23.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 8, part 2, §§ 53-8-201 — 53-8-222 (Acts 1986, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3-23; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 148, § 1; 1995, ch. 383, § 1; 2001, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 29, § 2), concerning the Retail Food Store Inspection Act of 1986, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 182, §§ 1-21, effective July 1, 2015. Section 53-8-222 was not affected by Acts 2013, ch. 182; therefore, the section was included in the reenacted title 53, ch. 8, part 2 without amendment.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 50. July 1, 2015; provided, that, for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 23, 2013.

53-8-223. Limited authority of local government to regulate food or drink.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, and except for subdivision (c)(1), the local government's authority under title 13, chapters 7, 16, and 28, and the local government's authority to regulate roadways, traffic, and the provision of utility services, this state is the exclusive regulator of food and drink sellers, vendors, vending machine operators, food establishments, and food service establishments in this state.

A local government, as that term is defined in § 7-51-2001, shall not impose a tax, fee, or otherwise regulate the wholesale or retail sale, manufacture, or distribution of any food or drink, food or drink content, amount of food or drink content, or food or drink ingredients, except as authorized under title 67, chapter 6, or § 67-4-504, or pursuant to a contract with the department of agriculture.

This section:

Does not prohibit a local government from regulating zoning, building codes, locations, hours of operation, or the issuance of permits, or from performing any other local governmental functions as authorized by existing state law, with respect to food and drink sellers and vendors, vending machine operators, food establishments, and food service establishments; and

Applies to both the sale and distribution of food or drink by food and drink sellers, food establishments, food service establishments, manufacturers of food and drink products regulated under chapter 1 of this title, and vending machines.

Acts 2019, ch. 158, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 158, § 5. April 12, 2019.